Mississippi, session 2026, HB230.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1. The Department of Human Services shall reinstate the program of providing nutritionally balanced meals to older individuals in community settings, such as congregate meal sites within senior centers. SECTION 2.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.